Wisconsin, session 2025, SB28.
do enact as follows:SB28,11Section 1. 196.485 (1) (cr) of the statutes is created to read:SB28,3,31196.485 (1) (cr) “Incumbent transmission facility owner” includes a 2transmission company or transmission utility, regardless of whether this state is its 3principal place of business or where it is organized or headquartered.SB28,24Section 2. 196.485 (1) (cr) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 5.... (this act), is repealed.SB28,36Section 3. 196.485 (1) (ef) of the statutes is created to read:SB28,3,107196.485 (1) (ef) “Regionally cost-shared transmission line” means a high-8voltage transmission line that is eligible, in whole or in part, for regional cost 9sharing and is not subject to a right of first refusal in accordance with the tariff of 10the Midwest independent system operator.SB28,411Section 4. 196.485 (1) (ef) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 12.... (this act), is repealed.SB28,513Section 5. 196.485 (3g) of the statutes is created to read:SB28,3,2314196.485 (3g) Incumbent transmission facility owner rights. (a) Rights. 15Subject to the approval of the commission under s. 196.491 (3), an incumbent 16transmission facility owner has the right to construct, own, and maintain a 17transmission facility that has been approved for construction in the Midwest 18independent system operator’s transmission plan and that connects to 19transmission facilities owned by that incumbent transmission facility owner. The 20right to construct, own, and maintain a transmission facility that connects to 21transmission facilities owned by 2 or more incumbent transmission facility owners 22belongs individually and proportionally to each incumbent transmission facility 23owner, unless otherwise agreed upon in writing.SB28,4,81(b) Commission procedure. 1. If, in the Midwest independent system 2operator’s transmission plan, a regionally cost-shared transmission line has been 3approved for construction and connection to facilities owned by an incumbent 4transmission facility owner, the incumbent transmission facility owner shall give 5written notice to the commission regarding the owner’s intent to construct, own, 6and maintain the regionally cost-shared transmission line no later than 90 days 7after approval of the transmission plan or 90 days after the effective date of this 8subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], whichever is later.SB28,4,1592. If an incumbent transmission facility owner indicates in its notice to the 10commission under subd. 1. that it does not intend to construct the regionally cost-11shared transmission line, it shall in the notice fully explain the basis for that 12decision. In that case, the commission may determine whether the incumbent 13transmission facility owner or another entity is required to construct the regionally 14cost-shared transmission line, taking into consideration issues such as cost, 15efficiency, reliability, and other factors identified in this chapter.SB28,4,1916(c) Cost control, requirement of competition, and cost allocation. With respect 17to a regionally cost-shared transmission line approved by the Midwest independent 18system operator, an incumbent transmission facility owner with the right to 19construct the transmission line shall do all of the following:SB28,4,23201. In any application filed pursuant to s. 196.491 (3), provide to the 21commission an estimate of the cost to construct the regionally cost-shared 22transmission line and documentation showing that this cost is the result of 23competitively bid engineering, procurement, and construction contracts.SB28,5,512. Until construction of the regionally cost-shared transmission line is 2complete, provide to the commission a quarterly report that includes an updated 3estimate of the cost to construct the regionally cost-shared transmission line and an 4explanation of changes from prior cost estimates provided under this subdivision or 5subd. 1.SB28,5,1063. As soon as practicable after the information is available, submit a report to 7the commission, the assembly speaker, the assembly minority leader, the senate 8majority leader, the senate minority leader, and the governor detailing the amount 9of the costs of the regionally cost-shared transmission line project that are being 10charged to energy consumers outside this state.SB28,611Section 6. 196.485 (3g) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 12(this act), is repealed.SB28,713Section 7. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 14publication, except as follows:SB28,5,1615(1) The repeal of ss. 196.485 (1) (cr) and (ef) and (3g) takes effect on the first 16day of the 10th year beginning after publication.SB28,5,1717